dev/scn2ipa.twol
Alphabet
a à:a
b 
c:k c:tʃ c:ɕ c:ʃ
d:d̪ d:ɖ
e:ɛ 
f
g:dʒ g:ʎ g:ʤ
h:0
i:ɪ i:0 i:j
j
k
l:ʎ
m 
n
o:ɔ
p 
r:ʐ 
r:ɾ 
t:t̪ 
u 
v 
z:ts z:d̪͡z̪
;

Rules

"c:sh before i"
c:ʃ <=> _ i: ;

"i:j before vowel"
i:j <=> _ [ a: | e: | i: | o: | u: ] ;
